Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,228
First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act; how cited.

Sections 77-27,228 to 77-27,234.01 shall be known and may be cited as the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act.

Laws 2026, LB803, § 1.
July 18, 2026